Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-631
Manual, defined.

Manual shall mean the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices adopted by the Department of Roads pursuant to section 60-6,118.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 127.